Nebraska, session 109, LB1100.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1100 LB1100
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 25-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-101 The distinctions between actions at law and suits in equity,
and the forms of all such actions and suits heretofore existing, are
abolished; and in their place there shall be hereafter but one form of
action, which shall be called a civil action.
Sec. 2. Original section 25-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-